pl: Zastosowanie gumki do dziurek na guziki: Odzież niemowlęca; Obszycie/wykończenie kocyków; Kostiumy/cosplay; Ogólne wykończenia krawieckie; Opaski/akcesoria do włosów; Bielizna damska/bielizna; Produkcja masek; Wykończenie dekoltu/pach; Odzież sportowa/aktywna; Stroje kąpielowe; Inne
ru: Область применения эластичной ленты для петель: Детская одежда; Окантовка одеял; Костюмы / косплей; Общая швейная отделка; Ободки / аксессуары для волос; Нижнее белье; Пошив масок; Окантовка горловины / проймы; Спортивная одежда; Купальники; Другое
el: Εφαρμογή λάστιχου με κουμπότρυπες: Βρεφικά ρούχα; Ρέλι/Τελείωμα κουβέρτας; Κοστούμι/Cosplay; Διακοσμητικό ραπτικής γενικής χρήσης; Στέκες/Αξεσουάρ μαλλιών; Εσώρουχα; Κατασκευή μάσκας; Ρέλι λαιμόκοψης/μασχάλης; Αθλητικά ρούχα; Μαγιό; Άλλο
nb: Knapphulls strikk-app: Babyklær; Teppekant/innbinding; Kostyme/cosplay; Generell sykant; Pannebånd/hårtilbehør; Lingeri/undertøy; Maskelaging; Halsringning/ermehullskant; Sportsklær/treningsklær; Badetøy; Annet
fi: Napinläpikuminauha: Vauvojen vaatteet; Peiton kanttaus/reunustus; Naamiaisasut/cosplay; Yleinen ompelunauha; Hiuspannat / hiusasusteet; Naisten alusvaatteet / alusvaatteet; Maskien valmistus; Pääntien / kädentien kanttaus; Urheiluvaatteet/treenivaatteet; Uima-asut; Muu
lt-LT: Kilpinės gumos naudojimo paskirtis: Kūdikių drabužiai; Apklotų apsiuvimas / apdaila; Kostiumai / persirengimo žaidimai („Cosplay“); Bendroji siuvimo apdaila; Galvos juostos / plaukų aksesuarai; Naktiniai drabužiai / apatinis trikotažas; Kaukių gamyba; Kaklo / rankovių iškirpčių apsiuvimas; Sportinė / aktyvaus laisvalaikio apranga; Maudymosi drabužiai; Kita
vi: Ứng dụng dây thun khuy: Quần áo trẻ sơ sinh; Bo/viền chăn; Hóa trang/cosplay; Viền may chung; Băng đô/phụ kiện tóc; Nội y/đồ lót; Làm mặt nạ; Viền cổ/viền nách; Đồ thể thao/đồ tập; Đồ bơi; Khác
pt-BR: Aplicação do elástico para casa de botão: Roupas de bebê; Acabamento/borda de cobertor; Fantasias/cosplay; Acabamentos de costura em geral; Faixas de cabeça/acessórios de cabelo; Lingerie/roupas íntimas; Confecção de máscaras; Acabamento de decote/cava; Moda esportiva/fitness; Moda praia; Outra
zh-CN: 扣眼松紧带用途: 婴儿服装; 毯子包边/锁边; 戏服/Cosplay; 通用缝纫饰边; 发带/发饰; 女士内衣/内衣; 口罩制作; 领口/袖窿包边; 运动服/运动装; 泳装; 其他
it: Applicazione elastica per asole: Abbigliamento per neonati; Bordatura/finitura per coperte; Costumi/cosplay; Bordo per cucito generale; Fasce/accessori per capelli; Lingerie/intimo; Creazione di maschere; Bordatura per scollature/giromanica; Abbigliamento sportivo; Costumi da bagno; Altro
zh-TW: 扣眼鬆緊帶應用: 嬰兒服裝; 毛毯包邊/緄邊; 戲服/角色扮演; 一般裁縫飾邊; 髮帶/髮飾; 內睡衣/內衣; 口罩製作; 領口/袖窿包邊; 運動服飾/機能服飾; 泳裝; 其他
ro-RO: Aplicație elastică pentru butonieră: Îmbrăcăminte pentru bebeluși; Finisare/margini pentru pături; Costume/cosplay; Garnituri generale pentru cusut; Bentițe/accesorii pentru păr; Lingerie/lenjerie intimă; Confecționare de măști; Finisare răscroială gât/mâneci; Îmbrăcăminte sport/activă; Costume de baie; Altele
bg-BG: Приложение на ластик с копчени отвори: Бебешко облекло; Обшиване/кантиране на одеяла; Костюми/косплей; Общи шивашки кантове; Ленти за глава/аксесоари за коса; Дамско бельо/бельо; Изработка на маски; Обшиване на деколте/ръкавна извивка; Спортно облекло; Бански костюми; Други
sl-SI: Aplikacija z elastiko za gumbnice: Oblačila za dojenčke; Obrobljanje odej; Kostumi/cosplay; Splošni šiviljski dodatki; Trakovi/dodatki za lase; Spodnje perilo; Izdelava mask; Obrobljanje izrezov za vrat/roke; Športna/aktivna oblačila; Kopalke; Drugo
sk-SK: Použitie pružnej gombíkovej dierky: Dojčenské oblečenie; Olemovanie diek; Kostýmy/cosplay; Bežná galantéria; Čelenky/doplnky do vlasov; Dámska bielizeň/spodná bielizeň; Výroba rúšok/masiek; Olemovanie výstrihu/prieramkov; Športové/funkčné oblečenie; Plavky; Iné
th: การใช้งานยางยืดสำหรับทำรังดุม: เสื้อผ้าทารก; การเย็บขอบ/กุ๊นขอบผ้าห่ม; คอสตูม/คอสเพลย์; งานเย็บตกแต่งทั่วไป; ที่คาดผม/เครื่องประดับผม; ชุดชั้นใน; การทำหน้ากาก; การกุ๊นขอบคอเสื้อ/วงแขน; ชุดกีฬา/ชุดออกกำลังกาย; ชุดว่ายน้ำ; อื่นๆ
en: Buttonhole elastic application: Baby clothing; Blanket binding/edging; Costume/cosplay; General sewing trim; Headbands/hair accessories; Lingerie/underwear; Mask making; Neckline/armhole binding; Sportswear/activewear; Swimwear; Other
sv: Användning för knapphålsresår: Babykläder; Filtkantning/kantband; Maskerad/cosplay; Allmänt sybehör; Pannband/håraccessoarer; Underkläder; Masktillverkning; Hals-/ärmringning; Sportkläder/träningskläder; Badkläder; Övrigt
hu: Gomblyukgumi alkalmazása: Babaruházat; Takaró szegélyezése/beszegése; Jelmez/cosplay; Általános varrási szegély; Fejpántok/hajkiegészítők; Fehérnemű; Maszkkészítés; Nyakkivágás/karkivágás szegélyezése; Sportruházat/szabadidő-ruházat; Fürdőruha; Egyéb
nl: Knoopsgatelastiek toepassing: Babykleding; Dekenrand/afboording; Kostuum/cosplay; Algemene naaiafwerking; Haarbanden/haaraccessoires; Lingerie/ondergoed; Maskers maken; Halslijn-/armsgatafwerking; Sportkleding/activewear; Zwemkleding; Overig
ko: 단추 구멍 밴드 용도: 유아복; 담요 바인딩/마감 처리; 코스튬/코스프레; 일반 재봉 트림; 헤어밴드/헤어 액세서리; 란제리/속옷; 마스크 제작; 네크라인/암홀 바인딩; 스포츠웨어/액티브웨어; 수영복; 기타
cs: Použití pruženky (gumy) do knoflíkové dírky: Dětské oblečení; Olemování/zakončení dek; Kostýmy/cosplay; Běžné šicí lemování; Čelenky / vlasové doplňky; Spodní prádlo; Výroba masek; Olemování výstřihu/průramků; Sportovní/funkční oblečení; Plavky; Jiné
hr-HR: Aplikacija s elastičnom gumicom za rupice za gumbe: Odjeća za bebe; Obrubljivanje deka; Kostimi/cosplay; Opći šivaći ukrasi; Trake za glavu / dodaci za kosu; Donje rublje; Izrada maski; Obrubljivanje dekoltea/rukava; Sportska odjeća; Kupaći kostimi; Ostalo
de: Anwendung des Knopflochgummis: Babybekleidung; Deckeneinfassung/-umrandung; Kostüme/Cosplay; Allgemeine Nähbesätze; Stirnbänder/Haarschmuck; Dessous/Unterwäsche; Maskenherstellung; Hals-/Armausschnitteinfassung; Sportbekleidung/Activewear; Bademode; Sonstige
fr: Usage de l’élastique à boutonnières: Vêtements pour bébés; Bordure/finition de couverture; Costume/cosplay; Garniture de couture générale; Bandeaux/accessoires pour cheveux; Lingerie/sous-vêtements; Fabrication de masques; Bordure d’encolure/emmanchure; Vêtements de sport/actifs; Maillots de bain; Autre
ja: ボタンホールゴム用途: ベビー服; ブランケットのバインディング/縁取り; コスチューム/コスプレ; 一般的な縫製トリム; ヘッドバンド/ヘアアクセサリー; ランジェリー/下着; マスク作り; ネックライン/アームホールのバインディング; スポーツウェア/アクティブウェア; スイムウェア; その他
da: Anvendelse af knaphulselastik: Babytøj; Kantebånd/kanter til tæpper; Kostume/cosplay; Almindelig sybesætning; Pandebånd/hårpynt; Lingeri/undertøj; Fremstilling af masker; Hals-/ærmegabskant; Sportstøj/aktivt tøj; Badetøj; Andet
tr: İlik lastiği kullanım alanı: Bebek giyim; Battaniye kenarı/süsü; Kostüm/cosplay; Genel dikiş şeridi; Saç bandı/saç aksesuarları; İç çamaşırı; Maske yapımı; Yaka/kol oyuğu biyesi; Spor giyim/aktif giyim; Mayo; Diğer
pt-PT: Aplicação elástica para casa de botão: Roupa de bebé; Debrum/remate de manta; Disfarce/cosplay; Acabamento de costura geral; Fitas de cabeça/acessórios de cabelo; Lingerie/roupa interior; Fabrico de máscaras; Debrum de decote/cava; Roupa desportiva/activewear; Roupa de banho; Outro
es: Aplicación de elástico para ojales: Ropa para bebés; Ribete de manta/borde; Disfraz/cosplay; Ribete de costura general; Diademas/accesorios para el cabello; Lencería/ropa interior; Fabricación de mascarillas; Ribete de cuello/sisa; Ropa deportiva/ropa activa; Trajes de baño; Otro